Utah statutes.
75-3-816.   Final distribution to domiciliary representative.
(1) The estate of a nonresident decedent being administered by a personal
representative appointed in this state shall, if there is a personal
representative of the decedent's domicile willing to receive it, be
distributed to the domiciliary personal representative for the benefit of the
successors of the decedent unless:
(a)  By virtue of the decedent's will, if any, and applicable choice of law
rules, the successors are identified pursuant to the local law of this state
without reference to the local law of the decedent's domicile;
(b)  The personal representative of this state, after reasonable inquiry, is
unaware of the existence or identity of a domiciliary personal representative;
or
(c)  The court orders otherwise in a proceeding for a closing order under
Section 75-3-1001 or incident to the closing of a supervised administration.
(2)  In other cases, distribution of the estate of a decedent shall be made in
accordance with the other parts of this chapter.
